Maine, session 132, LD127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §994, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2005, c. 104, §2, is further
amended to read:
11. Information and records available to committee. To receive certain information
and records, including information and records that are otherwise privileged or
confidential. Information and records that is are made available to the committee is are
governed by chapter 21, which governs legislative investigating committees, and by Title
1, chapter 13, which governs public records and proceedings, except that, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, privileged or confidential information and records
received by the committee under this subsection are confidential; and
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.